Kentucky, session 2026RS, SB154.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
Section 1. KRS 117.228 is amended to read as follows:
(1) Except as provided in subsection (4) of this section, on the day of a primary, an
election, or during in-person absentee voting, if a voter is unable to provide proof of
identification as required under KRS 117.225, and as defined under KRS 117.001, a
voter may cast a ballot if the individual:
(a) Is eligible to vote under KRS 116.025;
(b) Is entitled to vote in that precinct; and
(c) In the presence of the election officer, executes a voter's affirmation, on a
form prescribed and furnished by the State Board of Elections pursuant to
administrative regulations promulgated under KRS Chapter 13A, affirming:
1. The voter is a citizen of the United States;
2. The voter's date of birth to the best of the voter's knowledge and belief;
3. The voter is qualified to vote in this precinct under KRS 116.025;
4. The voter's name, and that the voter is generally known by that name, or
the name is as stated on his or her voter registration card;
5. The voter has not voted and will not vote in any other precinct;
6. The voter's current residential address, including the street address
number and, if different from the voter's current address, the voter's
residential address prior to the close of the registration books under KRS
116.045, and the date the voter moved;
7. The voter understands that making a false statement on the affirmation
is punishable under penalties of perjury; and
8. The voter has one (1) of the following impediments to procure proof of
identification as defined in KRS 117.001:
a. Lack of transportation;
Page 1 of 3
BR187900.100 - 1879 - XXXX 2/20/2026 10:30 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1879
b. Inability to obtain his or her birth certificate or other documents
needed to show proof of identification;
c. Work schedule;
d. Lost or stolen identification;
e. Disability or illness;
f. Family responsibilities;
g. The proof of identification has been applied for, but not yet
received; or
h. The voter has a religious objection to being photographed.
(2) In addition to the requirements of subsection (1) of this section, to cast a ballot, the
voter who is unable to provide proof of identification shall provide to an election
officer:
(a) [The voter's Social Security card;
(b) ]Any identification card issued by a county in this state which has the name of
the voter stated and has been approved in writing by the State Board of
Elections pursuant to administrative regulations promulgated under KRS
Chapter 13A; or
(b)[(c)] Any identification card with the voter's photograph and the name of the
voter stated;[ or
(d) Any food stamp identification card, electronic benefit transfer card, or
supplemental nutrition assistance card, that is issued by this state and has the
name of the voter stated].
(3) After the election officer obtains the affirmation from the voter required by
subsection (1) of this section, and after the voter provides the documents under
subsection (2) of this section, the voter shall sign the precinct signature roster and
shall proceed to cast his or her vote in a ballot completion area.
(4) If the voter is personally known to the election officer, the election officer may
Page 2 of 3
BR187900.100 - 1879 - XXXX 2/20/2026 10:30 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1879
execute an election officer affirmation, on a form prescribed and furnished by the
State Board of Elections pursuant to administrative regulations promulgated under
KRS Chapter 13A, affirming the voter's identification as being personally known to
him or her. Once the affirmation is executed by the election officer, the voter shall
sign the precinct signature roster and shall proceed to cast his or her vote in a ballot
completion area. For purposes of this subsection, "personally known" means that
the election officer knows the voter's name and that the voter is a resident of the
community.
(5) The voter affirmation and the election officer affirmations executed under this
section shall be processed in the same manner as an oath of voter affidavit as
prescribed by KRS 117.245(3) and (4).
Page 3 of 3
BR187900.100 - 1879 - XXXX 2/20/2026 10:30 AM Jacketed